Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
ARTICLE 16
COLORADO CHARITABLE SOLICITATIONS ACT

Section

6-16-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Charitable Solicitations Act".

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article added, p. 350, § 1, effective July 1.

6-16-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds that fraudulent charitable solicitations are a widespread practice in this state that results in millions of dollars of losses to contributors and legitimate charities each year. Legitimate charities are harmed by such fraud because the money available for contributions continually is being siphoned off by fraudulent charities, and the goodwill and confidence of contributors continually is being undermined by the practices of unscrupulous solicitors. The general assembly further finds that legitimate charities provide many public benefits and that charitable donations are a direct result of public trust in charities. The general assembly therefore finds that the provisions of this article, including those involving pertinent information to be filed in a timely manner by charitable organizations and disclosures to be made by paid solicitors, are necessary to protect the public's interest in making informed choices as to which charitable causes should be supported. Furthermore, these provisions are intended to help the secretary of state investigate allegations of wrongdoing in charities, without having a chilling effect on donors who wish to give anonymously or requiring public disclosure of confidential information about charities.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article added, p. 350, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 806, § 1, effective September 1.

6-16-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Charitable organization" means any person who is or holds himself out to be established for any benevolent, educational, philanthropic, humane, scientific, patriotic, social welfare or advocacy, public health, environmental conservation, civic, or other eleemosynary purpose, any person who operates for the benefit of the objectives of law enforcement officers, firefighters, other persons who protect the public safety, or veterans, or any person who in any manner employs a charitable appeal or an appeal which suggests that there is a charitable purpose as the basis for any solicitation. "Charitable organization" does not include the department of revenue collecting voluntary contributions for organ and tissue donations under the provisions of sections 42-2-107 (4)(b)(V) and 42-2-118 (1)(a)(II), C.R.S.

"Charitable purpose" means any benevolent, educational, philanthropic, humane, scientific, patriotic, social welfare or advocacy, public health, environmental conservation, civic, or other eleemosynary purpose, any objective of law enforcement officers, firefighters, other persons who protect the public safety, or veterans, or any objective of sponsoring the free or subsidized attendance of persons at any event.

"Charitable sales promotion" means an advertising or sales campaign which is conducted by a commercial coventurer and which represents that the purchase or use of goods or services offered by the commercial coventurer will benefit, in whole or in part, a charitable organization or purpose.

"Commercial coventurer" means a person who, for profit, is regularly and primarily engaged in trade or commerce other than in connection with soliciting for charitable organizations or purposes and who conducts a charitable sales promotion.

"Contribution" means the grant, promise, or pledge of money, credit, property, financial assistance, or any other thing of value in response to a solicitation. "Contribution" does not include voluntary contributions for organ and tissue donations under the provisions of sections 42-2-107 (4)(b)(V) and 42-2-118 (1)(a)(II), C.R.S., and bona fide fees, dues, or assessments paid by members of a charitable organization if membership is not conferred primarily as consideration for making a contribution in response to a solicitation.

Repealed.

"Paid solicitor" means a person who, for monetary compensation, performs any service in which contributions will be solicited in this state by such compensated person or by any compensated person he or she employs, procures, or engages to solicit for contributions. The following persons are not "paid solicitors":

A person whose sole responsibility is to print or mail fund-raising literature;

A lawyer, investment counselor, or banker who renders professional services to a charitable organization or advises a person to make a charitable contribution during the course of rendering such professional services or advice to the charitable organization or person;

A bona fide volunteer;

A director, officer, or compensated employee who is directly employed by a charitable organization which, at the time of the solicitation, had received a determination letter from the internal revenue service granting the organization tax-exempt status pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 501 (c)(3), (c)(4), (c)(8), (c)(10), or (c)(19). For purposes of this paragraph (d), such a determination letter shall not have retroactive effect.

Any employee of the department of revenue collecting voluntary contributions for organ and tissue donations under sections 42-2-107 (4)(b)(V) and 42-2-118 (1)(a)(II), C.R.S.;

A person whose only responsibility in connection with a charitable contribution is to provide a merchant account to process credit card payments using the internet;

A person who prepares a grant application for a charitable organization or purpose, unless the person's compensation is computed on the basis of funds to be raised or actually raised as a result of the grant application; or

A person who provides any service or product to a charitable organization who does not directly solicit for a charitable contribution.

"Person" means an individual, a corporation, an association, a partnership, a trust, a foundation, or any other entity however organized or any group of individuals associated in fact but not a legal entity.

Repealed.

(9.3) "Professional fundraising consultant" means any person, other than a bona fide officer or regular employee of a charitable organization, who is retained by a charitable organization for a fixed fee or rate under a written agreement to plan, manage, advise, consult, or prepare material for or with respect to the solicitation in this state of contributions for a charitable organization but who does not solicit contributions or employ, procure, or engage any compensated person to solicit contributions. No lawyer, investment counselor, or banker who renders professional services to a charitable organization or advises a person to make a charitable contribution during the course of rendering professional services to the person shall be deemed, as a result of such professional services or advice, to be a "professional fundraising consultant".

(9.5) "Records" means books, financial statements, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records that the secretary of state deems relevant or material to an inquiry.

"Solicit" or "solicitation" means to request, or the request for, directly or indirectly, money, credit, property, financial assistance, or any other thing of value on the plea or representation that such money, credit, property, financial assistance, or other thing of value, or any portion thereof, will be used for a charitable purpose or will benefit a charitable organization. The term "solicit" or "solicitation" shall include, but need not be limited to, the following methods of requesting or securing such money, credit, property, financial assistance, or other thing of value:

Any oral or written request; or

Any sale or attempted sale of or any offer to sell any advertisement, advertising space, book, card, tag, coupon, device, magazine, membership, merchandise, subscription, flower, ticket, candy, cookies, or other tangible item in which any appeal is made for any charitable organization or purpose, or for which the name of any charitable organization is used or referred to in any such appeal as an inducement or reason for making any such sale, or for which any statement is made that the proceeds or any portion thereof from such sale will be used for any charitable purpose or will benefit any charitable organization. A "solicitation" shall be deemed to have taken place whether or not the person making the "solicitation" receives any contribution.

"Solicitation campaign" means a series of solicitations which are made by the same person and which are similar in content or are based on a similar pitch or sales approach, which series leads up to or is represented to lead up to an event or lasts or is intended to last for a definite period of time. If the series of solicitations lasts or is intended to last for an indefinite period of time or for more than one year, a "solicitation campaign" means all similar solicitations made by the same person occurring within a particular calendar year.

(11.5) "Suspend" means that a charitable organization, professional fund-raising consultant, or paid solicitor is prohibited from soliciting contributions, providing consulting services in connection with a solicitation campaign, or conducting a solicitation campaign in Colorado.

"Volunteer" means a person who renders services to a charitable organization or for a charitable purpose and who neither receives nor is expressly or impliedly promised financial remuneration for said services.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article added, p. 350, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(6) and (9) repealed and IP(7) amended, pp. 367, 364, §§ 8, 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) and (5) amended and (7)(e) added, p. 1135, §§ 3, 4, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

IP(7) amended and (9.3) added, p. 1236, § 1, effective May 9, 2002.

L. 2003:

(7)(f) added, p. 2496, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2005:

(7)(b) and (9.3) amended, p. 1286, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2008:

(9.5) and (11.5) added, p. 806, § 2, effective September 1.

L. 2012:

(7)(e) and (7)(f) amended and (7)(g) added, (HB 12-1236), ch. 133, p. 456, § 1, effective January 1, 2013.

L. 2016:

IP(7), (7)(f), and (7)(g) amended and (7)(h) added, (HB 16-1129), ch. 262, p. 1076, § 2, effective August 10.

6-16-104. Charitable organizations - initial registration - annual filing - fees.

Every charitable organization, except those exempted under subsection (6) of this section, that intends to solicit contributions in this state by any means or to have contributions solicited in this state on its behalf by any other person or entity or that participates in a charitable sales promotion shall, prior to engaging in any of these activities, file a registration statement with the secretary of state upon a form prescribed by the secretary of state. Each chapter, branch, or affiliate of a charitable organization that is required to file a registration statement under this section either shall file a separate registration statement or shall report the necessary information to its parent charitable organization, which then shall file a consolidated registration statement.

The registration statement must be signed and affirmed under penalty of perjury as defined in section 18-8-503 by an officer of the charitable organization, which may include its chief fiscal officer, and must contain the following information:

The name of the charitable organization, the purpose for which it is organized, and the name or names under which it intends to solicit contributions;

The address and telephone number of the principal place of business of the charitable organization and the address and telephone number of any offices in this state, or, if the charitable organization does not maintain an office in this state, the name, address, and telephone number of the person that has custody of its financial records;

The names of the officers, directors, trustees, and executive personnel of the charitable organization;

The last day of the fiscal year of the charitable organization;

The place and date when the charitable organization was legally established, the form of its organization, and its tax-exempt status;

A financial report for the most recent fiscal year, upon a form prescribed by the secretary of state, or, in the discretion of the secretary of state, a copy of the charitable organization's federal form 990, with all schedules except schedules of donors, for the most recent fiscal year. If, at the time of the initial registration, the charitable organization does not have the required financial report or form 990 for the most recent fiscal year, the charitable organization shall submit a financial report or form 990 for the most recent fiscal year in which such information is available. An organization that was first legally established within the past year and thus does not have financial information or a form 990 for its most recent fiscal year shall provide to the secretary of state a financial report based on good faith estimates for its current fiscal year on a form prescribed by the secretary of state. Any organization that files a good faith estimate for its first fiscal year shall amend its initial registration statement to report actual financial information on or before the earlier of the fifteenth day of the eighth month after the close of the organization's first fiscal year or the date authorized for filing a form 990 with the internal revenue service.

The names and addresses of any paid solicitors, professional fundraising consultants, and commercial coventurers who are acting or have agreed to act on behalf of the charitable organization. If the paid solicitor, professional fundraising consultant, or commercial coventurer is a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity, the charitable organization shall list only the name and address of the legal entity.

The secretary of state may promulgate rules concerning the acceptance of a uniform multistate registration statement, such as a unified registration statement, in lieu of the registration statement described in subsection (2) of this section. As soon as practicable, the secretary of state shall take steps to cooperate in a joint state and federal electronic filing project involving state charity offices and the internal revenue service to enable and promote electronic filing of uniform multistate registration statements and federal annual information returns.

A charitable organization's registration is valid until the day on which the financial report required in subsection (2)(f) or (5) of this section is due and may be renewed upon application to the secretary of state and payment of the registration fee and any assessed fines.

A charitable organization that withdraws its registration or allows its registration to expire must, on or before the date of withdrawal or expiration, file a final financial report, in a form prescribed by the secretary of state, that includes information through the last date on which the organization solicited contributions in Colorado.

A charitable organization shall report any changes of name, address, principals, corporate forms, tax status, and any other changes that materially affect the identity or business of the charitable organization to the secretary of state within thirty days after the change.

Every charitable organization required to register under this section shall annually file with the secretary of state a financial report for the most recent fiscal year on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, or, in the discretion of the secretary of state, a copy of the charitable organization's federal form 990, with all schedules except schedules of donors, for the most recent fiscal year. The financial report must be filed on or before the earlier of the fifteenth day of the eighth calendar month after the close of each fiscal year in which the charitable organization solicited in this state or the date authorized for filing a form 990 with the internal revenue service. A charitable organization that is unable to file a copy of its form 990 return or the secretary of state's financial form by the prescribed deadline may request an extension of the filing deadline from the secretary of state. The secretary of state, upon receipt of an application to extend the filing deadline, may grant a three-month extension of time to file the financial report. All requests for extension of time must:

Be in a form prescribed by the secretary of state;

Include a statement describing in detail the reasons causing the delay in filing the financial report;

Include an affirmation that the charitable organization has filed with the internal revenue service an application for a corresponding extension of time to file the organization's form 990; and

Be signed and affirmed under penalty of perjury as defined in section 18-8-503.

Upon request, the charitable organization shall provide the secretary of state with a copy of its application for extension of time to file with the internal revenue service in order to verify the date authorized for filing its form 990 with the internal revenue service.

The following are not required to file a registration statement:

Persons that are exempt from filing a federal annual information return pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 6033 (a)(3)(A)(i), (a)(3)(A)(iii), or (a)(3)(C)(i) or pursuant to 26 CFR 1.6033-2 (g)(1)(i) to (g)(1)(iv) or (g)(1)(vii);

Political parties, candidates for federal or state office, and political action committees required to file financial information with federal or state elections commissions;

Charitable organizations that do not intend to and do not actually raise or receive gross revenue, excluding grants from governmental entities or from organizations exempt from federal taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars during a fiscal year or do not receive contributions from more than ten persons during a fiscal year. The exemption authorized in this paragraph (c) shall not apply to a charitable organization that has contracted with a paid solicitor to solicit contributions in this state for the organization.

Persons exclusively making appeals for funds on behalf of a specific individual named in the solicitation, but only if all of the proceeds of the solicitation are given to or expended for the direct benefit of the specified individual.

Filing fees for the annual registration of a charitable organization and for amendments thereto shall be established by the secretary of state in an amount that reflects the costs of the secretary of state in administering the provisions of this article. All such fees collected shall be deposited in the department of state cash fund created in section 24-21-104 (3)(b), C.R.S.

The secretary of state shall examine each registration to determine whether the applicable requirements of this section are satisfied. The secretary of state shall notify the charitable organization within ten days after receipt of its application of any deficiencies therein, otherwise the registration shall be deemed approved as filed. The secretary of state shall issue each approved applicant a registration number.

A charitable organization that is required to register under this article 16 shall not:

Prior to registration or renewal of an expired registration, solicit contributions in this state by any means, have contributions solicited in this state on its behalf by any other person or entity, or participate in a charitable sales promotion; or

Aid, abet, or otherwise permit any paid solicitor to solicit contributions on its behalf in this state unless the paid solicitor soliciting contributions has complied with the requirements of this article.

All information filed pursuant to this section, except for residential addresses and telephone numbers of individuals, account numbers at banks or other financial institutions, and schedules of contributors listed on the federal form 990 or its equivalent, is a public record for purposes of the public records law, part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article added, p. 352, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1)(d), (1)(e), and (2) amended and (5) and (6) repealed, pp. 364, 367, §§ 2, 8, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1237, § 2, effective May 9, 2002.

L. 2002:

(2)(f), (4), and (5) amended, p. 948, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

IP(2) and (6)(a) amended, p. 2496, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2005:

(2)(f), (3), and (6)(c) amended and (2)(g) added, p. 1287, § 2, effective June 3.

L. 2009:

(6)(a) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1986, § 133, effective August 5.

L. 2012:

IP(2), (2)(f), (5), IP(6), and (6)(b) amended and (6)(d) added, (HB 12-1236), ch. 133, p. 457, § 2, effective January 1, 2013.

L. 2013:

(6)(a) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1663, § 7, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(2)(c), (9), and (10) amended, (HB 14-1206), ch. 118, p. 420, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

IP(2), (2)(c), (4), (5), IP(9), and (9)(a) amended, (HB 17-1158), ch. 160, p. 592, § 1, effective October 1, 2018.

6-16-104.3. Professional fundraising consultants - annual registration - fees.

No person shall act as a professional fundraising consultant without first complying with the requirements of this section.

Every contract between a professional fundraising consultant and a charitable organization or sponsor shall be in writing and signed by an authorized official of the charitable organization. The professional fundraising consultant shall provide a copy of the contract to the charitable organization prior to the performance of any material services under the contract and shall make a copy of the contract available to the secretary of state upon request. The contract shall contain all of the following provisions:

A statement of the charitable purpose for which the solicitation campaign is being conducted;

A statement of the respective obligations of the professional fundraising consultant and the charitable organization;

Whether the professional fundraising consultant will at any time have custody or control of contributions;

A clear statement of the fees that will be paid to the professional fundraising consultant or, if the fees are to be calculated based on a percentage of contributions or other formula, a clear statement of the percentage or other formula; and

The effective and termination dates of the contract.

A professional fundraising consultant who at any time has or will have custody or control of contributions from a solicitation conducted on behalf of a charitable organization in this state shall also comply with the registration requirements of this section before performing any material services with respect to such solicitation.

Applications for registration or renewal of registration must be submitted on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, signed and affirmed under penalty of perjury as defined in section 18-8-503, and must include the following information:

The address and telephone number of the principal place of business of the applicant and the address and telephone number of any office located in this state if the principal place of business is located outside the state;

The form of the applicant's business and, if the applicant is not an individual, the place and date when the applicant was incorporated or otherwise legally established;

The name, address, and telephone number of the person that has custody of the applicant's financial records;

If the applicant is not an individual, the names and addresses of the owners, officers, and executive personnel of the applicant;

Whether the applicant or any of its owners, officers, directors, trustees, or employees have, within the immediately preceding five years, been convicted of, found guilty of, pled guilty or nolo contendere to, been adjudicated a juvenile violator of, or been incarcerated for any felony involving fraud, theft, larceny, embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, or misappropriation of property or any crime arising from the conduct of a solicitation for a charitable organization or sponsor, under the laws of this or any other state or of the United States, and if so, the name of such person, the nature of the offense, the date of the offense, the court having jurisdiction in the case, the date of conviction or other disposition, and the disposition of the offense;

Whether the applicant or any of its owners, officers, directors, trustees, or employees have been enjoined from violating any law relating to a charitable solicitation or from engaging in charitable solicitation and, if so, the name of such person, the date of the injunction, and the court issuing the injunction;

Whether the applicant is registered with or otherwise authorized by any other state to act as a professional fundraising consultant; and

Whether the applicant has had such registration or authority denied, suspended, revoked, or enjoined by any court or other governmental authority in this state or another state.

The application for registration or for renewal shall be accompanied by the fee established pursuant to subsection (12) of this section. A professional fundraising consultant that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company may register for and pay a single fee on behalf of all its partners, members, officers, directors, agents, and employees. In such case, the names and street addresses of all the partners, members, officers, directors, employees, and agents of the fundraising consultant and all other persons with whom the fundraising consultant has contracted to work under its direction shall be listed in the application or furnished to the secretary of state within five days after the date of employment or contractual arrangement.

Each registration is valid for a period of one year and may be renewed, on or before the anniversary date, for an additional one-year period upon application to the secretary of state and payment of the registration fee. Any material changes to the information contained in the application for registration shall be reported in writing to the secretary of state within thirty days.

The secretary of state shall examine each registration to determine whether the applicable requirements of this section are satisfied. The secretary of state shall notify the applicant within ten days after receipt of its application of any deficiencies therein, otherwise the application shall be deemed approved as filed. The secretary of state shall issue each approved applicant a registration number.

If a professional fundraising consultant will have custody of any contribution received during a solicitation campaign, each such contribution shall be deposited within two business days after its receipt in an account at a bank or other federally insured financial institution. The account shall be in the name of the charitable organization with whom the professional fundraising consultant has contracted, and the charitable organization shall have sole control over all withdrawals from the account.

Within ninety days after a solicitation campaign has been concluded, and on the anniversary of the commencement of a solicitation campaign lasting more than one year, the professional fundraising consultant shall provide to the charitable organization a financial report of the campaign, including gross proceeds and an itemization of all expenses or disbursements for any purpose. The report shall be signed by the professional fundraising consultant or, if the professional fundraising consultant is not an individual, by an authorized officer or agent of the professional fundraising consultant, who shall certify that the financial report is true and complete to the best of the person's knowledge. The professional fundraising consultant shall provide a copy of the report to the secretary of state upon request.

No person may act as a professional fundraising consultant and no professional fundraising consultant required to be registered under this section shall knowingly employ any person as an officer, trustee, director, or employee if such person, within the immediately preceding five years, has been convicted of, found guilty of, pled guilty or nolo contendere to, been adjudicated a juvenile violator of, or been incarcerated for any felony involving fraud, theft, larceny, embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, or misappropriation of property or any crime arising from the conduct of a solicitation for a charitable organization or sponsor, under the laws of this or any other state or of the United States, or has been enjoined within the immediately preceding five years under the laws of this or any other state or of the United States from engaging in deceptive conduct relating to charitable solicitations.

Information filed pursuant to this section, except for residential addresses and telephone numbers of individuals and account numbers at banks or other financial institutions, is a public record for purposes of the public records law, part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

Filing fees for the annual registration of a professional fundraising consultant and for amendments thereto shall be established by the secretary of state in an amount that reflects the costs of the secretary of state in administering the provisions of this article. All such fees collected shall be deposited in the department of state cash fund created in section 24-21-104 (3)(b), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 1239, § 3, effective May 9, 2002.

L. 2003:

IP(2) amended, p. 2497, § 3, effective June 5.

L. 2005:

(4)(a.5) added and (4)(c) amended, p. 1288, § 3, effective June 3.

L. 2014:

(11) amended, (HB 14-1206), ch. 118, p. 421, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

IP(4) amended, (HB 17-1158), ch. 160, p. 594, § 2, effective October 1, 2018.

6-16-104.5. Additional reporting requirements. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 235, § 1, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective December 31, 1994. (See L. 92, p. 235.)